Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 6. Recovery for Labor or Supplies

§ 37-9-601.
Contractor's bond.

Whenever any railroad company shall contract with any person, persons or corporation for the construction of its railroad or any part thereof, the company shall take from the person, persons, or corporation with whom a contract is made, a good and sufficient bond, in some guarantee or surety company authorized to do business in this state, conditioned that the contractor or contractors shall pay or cause to be paid all laborers, mechanics, materialmen, ranchmen, farmers, merchants, and other persons who supply the contractor or contractors, or any of his or their subcontractors, with labor, work, material, ranch or farm products, provisions, goods or supplies of any kind, all just debts incurred therefor in carrying on the work, which bond shall be filed by the company in the office of the county clerk in the county where the principal work of the contractor shall be carried on; and if any railroad company shall fail to take a bond, the railroad company shall be liable to the persons herein mentioned to the full extent of all debts so contracted by the contractor, or contractors, or any of his or their subcontractors. Any contractor or contractors may take a similar bond from each of his or their subcontractors to secure the payment of all debts of the kind above mentioned, incurred by him, and file the same as above provided. All persons mentioned in this section to whom any debt of the kind above mentioned shall be due from any contractor or subcontractor shall severally have a right of action upon any bond covering the debt taken as herein provided for the recovery of the full amount of the debt, and a certified copy of the bond shall be received as evidence in any action; provided, however, that in order that the right of action upon the bonds may exist, the person or parties herein granted the right shall comply with either of the following conditions, to-wit: First, an action in a court of competent jurisdiction, in the county where the bond is filed shall be commenced within ninety (90) days after the last item of indebtedness shall have accrued; or second, an itemized statement of the indebtedness duly verified shall within ninety (90) days after the last item of the indebtedness shall have accrued be filed in the office of the county clerk of the proper county; and an action shall be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction of the county within three (3) months after the filing of the statement. In case an action is commenced upon the bond of a contractor, the contractor may give notice thereof to the subcontractor liable for the claim, and in a case the result of the action shall be binding upon the subcontractor, and his sureties, and in any case when a contractor has paid a claim for which a subcontractor is liable, the contractor shall bring action against the subcontractor and his sureties within sixty (60) days after the payment of the claim.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 124, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3826; C.S. 1920, § 4890; R.S. 1931, § 96-301; C.S. 1945, § 65-601; W.S. 1957, § 37-228; Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

Cross references. —

As to payment of wages generally, see §

27-4-101

et seq.

As to builders' liens, see §§

29-2-101

to 29-2-111.

The 2004 amendment

made stylistic changes throughout.

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in the first sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).

§ 37-9-602.
Verified statement of account; to be delivered to company; account to be withheld out of subsequent payments.

Every laborer, mechanic, ranchman, farmer, merchant, or other person performing any work or labor or furnishing any material, ranch or farm products, provisions, goods, or supplies to any contractor or subcontractor, in the construction of any railroad, or any part thereof, used by such contractor or subcontractor in carrying on said work of construction whose demand for work, labor, material, ranch or farm products, provisions, goods, or supplies so furnished has not been paid, may deliver to the company owning such railroad or to its agent, a verified account of the amount and value of the work, and labor so performed or the material, ranch or farm products, provisions, goods or supplies so furnished, and thereupon such company, or its agent, shall retain out of the subsequent payments to the contractor or contractors the amount of such unpaid account for the benefit of the person to whom the same is due.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 124, § 2; C.S. 1910, § 3827; C.S. 1920, § 4891; R.S. 1931, § 96-302; C.S. 1945, § 65-602; W.S. 1957, § 37-229.

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).

§ 37-9-603.
Verified statement of account; recovery procedure.

Whenever any verified account mentioned in the last preceding section [§

37-9-602

] shall be placed in the hands of any railroad company or its agent as above stated, it shall be the duty of such company to furnish the contractor with a copy of such verified account, so that if there be any disagreement between the debtor and creditor as to the amount due the same may be amicably adjusted, and if the contractor or subcontractor, if he be the debtor, shall not, within ten (10) days after the receipt of such account, give the said railroad company or its agent, written notice that the claim is disputed, he shall be considered as assenting to its payment, and the railroad company or its agent, shall be justified in paying the same when due and charging the same to the contractor. The person or persons to whom any such debt is due and who shall deliver a verified account thereof as above provided may recover the amount thereof in an action at law, to the extent of any balance due by the railroad company to the contractor at or after the time of delivering the verified account; provided, that nothing contained in this section or in section 2 of this act [§

37-9-602

] shall interfere with the right of action upon the bond or bonds provided for in section 1 of this act [§

37-9-601

], or against the railroad company for the full amount of any such debt in case of a failure of the company to take a bond.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 124, § 3; C.S. 1910, § 3828; C.S. 1920, § 4892; R.S. 1931, § 96-303; C.S. 1945, § 65-603; W.S. 1957, § 37-230.

Cited

in

George Bolln Co. v. North Platte Valley Irrigation Co., 19 Wyo. 542, 121 P. 22,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 9

, 39 L.R.A. (n.s.) 868 (1912).